cs: Materiál pálky: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozitní; Kov; Dřevo; Jiné
tr: Sopa malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Metal; Ahşap; Diğer
bg-BG: Материал на бухалката: Алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Композит; Метал; Дърво; Други
da: Batmateriale: Aluminum; Kulfiber; Komposit; Metal; Træ; Andet
sv: Slagträ - material: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Sammansatt; Metall; Trä; Övrigt
es: Material del bate: Aluminio; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Metal; Madera; Otros
lt-LT: Beisbolo lazdos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Metalas; Mediena; Kita
it: Materiale pipistrello: Alluminio; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Metallo; Legno; Altro
hu: Ütő anyaga: Alumínium; Szénszálas; Kompozit; Fém; Fa; Egyéb
sk-SK: Materiál pálky: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Kov; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Material do taco: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Metal; Madeira; Outro
vi: Vật liệu gậy đánh bóng: Nhôm; Sợi carbon; Tổng hợp; Kim loại; Gỗ; Khác
fr: Matériau de la batte: Aluminum; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Métal; Bois; Autre
ja: バット材質: アルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; 複合; 金属; 木材; その他
nb: Slagmateriale: Aluminium; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Metall; Trevirke; Annet
el: Υλικό μπαστουνιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακόνημα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Μέταλλο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material de morcego: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Metal; Madeira; Outro
th: วัสดุสำหรับไม้ตี: อะลูมิเนียม; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; โลหะ; ไม้; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material za kij: Aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Kovina; Les; Drugo
pl: Materiał kija: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Metal; Drewno; Inne
fi: Mailan materiaali: Alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Metalli; Puu; Muu
ru: Материал биты: Алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Композит; Металл; Дерево; Другое
ro-RO: Material bâtă: Aluminiu; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Metal; Lemn; Altele
ko: 배트 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 복합물; 금속; 목재; 기타
en: Bat material: Aluminum; Carbon fiber; Composite; Metal; Wood; Other
hr-HR: Materijal palice: Aluminij; Karbonska vlakna; Kompozit; Metal; Drvo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 球棒材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 複合; 金屬; 木材; 其他
de: Schlägermaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstofffaser; Zusammengesetzt; Metall; Holz; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 球棒材质: 铝; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 金属; 木头; 其他
nl: Materiaal knuppel: Aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Metaal; Hout; Andere